Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-640.04
Birth certificate; name of father changed; when.

The name of the father as shown on the birth certificate may be changed and a new certificate issued only when a determination of paternity is made by a court of competent jurisdiction. The evidence from which the new certificate is prepared and the original certificate of birth shall be available for inspection only upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 12.